Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.380

Resolution to authorize bonds—Contents.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely out of the operating revenues of the park and recreation district. Such bonds shall be authorized by resolution adopted by the board of park and recreation commissioners, which resolution shall create a special fund or funds into which the board of park and recreation commissioners may obligate and bind the district to set aside and pay any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or fixed amounts of gross revenue received by the district from moneys for services or activities as stated in the resolution, for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such bonds as the same shall become due, and if deemed necessary to maintain adequate reserves therefor. Such fund or funds shall be drawn upon solely for the purpose of paying the principal and interest upon the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

The bonds shall be negotiable instruments within the provision and intent of the negotiable instruments law of this state, even though they shall be payable solely from such special fund or funds, and the tax revenue of the district may not be used to pay, secure, or guarantee the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The bonds and any coupons attached thereto shall state upon their face that they are payable solely from such special fund or funds. If the county fails to set aside and pay into such fund or funds, the payments provided for in such resolution, the owner of any such bonds may bring suit to compel compliance with the provisions of the resolution.

[ 1983 c 167 s 87; 1972 ex.s. c 94 s 6.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.